North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 19B. The Secure and Fair Enforcement Mortgage Licensing Act.
§ 53-244.109.
Mortgage broker duties.

Any mortgage broker engaged in the mortgage business as defined by G.S. 53-244.030(11)a., in addition to duties imposed by other statutes or at common law, shall do all of the following:

Safeguard and account for any money handled for the borrower.

Follow reasonable and lawful instructions from the borrower.

Act with reasonable skill, care, and diligence.

Make reasonable efforts to secure a loan that is reasonably advantageous to the borrower considering all the circumstances, including the rates, charges, and repayment terms of the loan.

Timely and clearly disclose to the borrower material information that may be expected to influence the borrower’s decision and is reasonably accessible to the mortgage broker, including the total compensation the mortgage broker expects to receive from any and all sources in connection with each loan option presented to the borrower.

Notify before closing each lender of the particulars of each of the other lender’s loans if the mortgage broker knows that more than one mortgage loan will be made by different lenders contemporaneously to a borrower.

Ensure that any services offered to any applicant shall be available and offered to all similarly situated applicants on an equal basis.

In transactions where the mortgage broker has the ability to make credit decisions, use reasonable means to provide the borrower with prompt credit decisions on its loan applications and, where the credit is denied, to comply fully with the notification requirements of applicable State and federal law.

Ensure that advertising materials are designed to make customers and potential customers aware that the mortgage broker does not discriminate on any prohibited basis.

Represent the borrower’s best interest in the course of brokering a mortgage loan.

Have a duty of loyalty to the borrower, which shall include a duty not to compromise a borrower’s right or interest in favor of another’s right or interest, including a right or interest of the mortgage broker.

History.

2009-374, s. 2.

§ 53-244.110.
Mortgage servicer duties.

Any mortgage servicer engaged in the mortgage business as defined by G.S. 53-244.030(11)c., in addition to duties imposed by other statutes or at common law, shall do all of the following:

Safeguard and account for any money handled for the borrower.

Follow reasonable and lawful instructions from the borrower.

Act with reasonable skill, care, and diligence.

File with the Commissioner a complete, current schedule of the ranges of costs and fees it charges borrowers for its servicing-related activities with its application and renewal and with its supplemental filings made from time to time.

File with the Commissioner upon request a report in a form and format acceptable to the Commissioner detailing the servicer’s activities in this State, including:

The number of mortgage loans the servicer is servicing.

The type and characteristics of the loans in this State.

The number of serviced loans in default, along with a breakdown of 30-, 60-, and 90-day delinquencies.

Information on loss mitigation activities, including details on workout arrangements undertaken.

Information on foreclosures commenced in this State.

At the time a servicer accepts assignment of servicing rights for a mortgage loan, the servicer shall disclose to the borrower all of the following:

Any notice required by RESPA or by regulations promulgated thereunder.

A schedule of the ranges and categories of its costs and fees for its servicing-related activities, which shall comply with North Carolina law and which shall not exceed those reported to the Commissioner.

A notice in a form and content acceptable to the Commissioner that the servicer is licensed by the Commissioner and that complaints about the servicer may be submitted to the Commissioner.

Any notice required by Article 2A, 4, or 10 of Chapter 45 of the General Statutes.

In the event of a delinquency or other act of default on the part of the borrower, the mortgage servicer shall act in good faith to inform the borrower of the facts concerning the loan and the nature and extent of the delinquency or default and, if the borrower replies, to negotiate with the borrower, subject to the mortgage servicer’s duties and obligations under the mortgage servicing contract, if any, to attempt a resolution or workout to the delinquency.

History.

2009-374, s. 2.

§ 53-244.111.
Prohibited acts.

In addition to the activities prohibited under other provisions of this Article, it shall be unlawful for any person in the course of any residential mortgage loan transaction:

To misrepresent or conceal the material facts or make false promises likely to influence, persuade, or induce an applicant for a mortgage loan or a mortgagor to take a mortgage loan, or to pursue a course of misrepresentation through agents or otherwise.

To improperly refuse to issue a satisfaction of a mortgage.

To fail to account for or to deliver to any person any funds, documents, or other thing of value obtained in connection with a mortgage loan, including money provided by a borrower for a real estate appraisal or a credit report, which the mortgage lender, mortgage broker, mortgage servicer, mortgage loan originator, or transitional mortgage loan originator is not entitled to retain under the circumstances.

To pay, receive, or collect in whole or in part any commission, fee, or other compensation for brokering or servicing a mortgage loan in violation of this Article, including a mortgage loan brokered or serviced by any unlicensed person other than an exempt person.

To charge or collect any fee or rate of interest or to make or broker or service any mortgage loan with terms or conditions or in a manner contrary to the provisions of Chapter 24, 45, or 54 of the General Statutes.

To advertise mortgage loans, including rates, margins, discounts, points, fees, commissions, or other material information, including material limitations on the loans, unless the person is able to make the mortgage loans available to a reasonable number of qualified applicants.

To fail to disburse funds in accordance with a written commitment or agreement to make a mortgage loan.

To engage in any transaction, practice, or course of business that is not in good faith or fair dealing or that constitutes a fraud upon any person in connection with the brokering or making or servicing of, or purchase or sale of, any mortgage loan.

To fail to pay promptly when due reasonable fees to a licensed appraiser for appraisal services that are:

Requested from the appraiser in writing by the mortgage broker or mortgage lender or an employee of the mortgage broker or mortgage lender; and

Performed by the appraiser in connection with the origination or closing of a mortgage loan for a customer or the mortgage broker or mortgage lender.

To broker a mortgage loan that contains a prepayment penalty if the principal amount of the loan is one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) or less or if the loan is a rate spread home loan as defined in

G.S. 24-1.1

F.

To improperly influence or attempt to improperly influence the development, reporting, result, or review of a real estate appraisal sought in connection with a mortgage loan. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to prohibit a mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or mortgage servicer from asking the appraiser to do one or more of the following:

Consider additional appropriate property information.

Provide further detail, substantiation, or explanation for the appraiser’s value conclusion.

Correct errors in the appraisal report.

To fail to comply with the mortgage loan servicing transfer, escrow account administration, or borrower inquiry response requirements imposed by sections 6 and 10 of RESPA and regulations adopted thereunder.

To broker a rate spread adjustable rate mortgage loan without disclosing to the borrower the terms and costs associated with a fixed rate loan from the same lender at the lowest annual percentage rate for which the borrower qualifies.

To fail to comply with applicable State and federal laws and regulations related to mortgage lending or mortgage servicing.

To engage in unfair, misleading, or deceptive advertising related to a solicitation for a mortgage loan.

In connection with the brokering or making of a rate spread home loan as defined under

G.S. 24-1.1

F, no lender shall provide nor shall any broker receive any compensation that changes based on the terms of the loan. This subdivision shall not prohibit compensation based on the principal balance of the loan.

For a mortgage servicer to fail to comply with the mortgage servicer’s obligations under Article 10 of Chapter 45 of the General Statutes.

For a mortgage servicer to fail to provide written notice to a borrower upon taking action to place hazard, homeowner’s, or flood insurance on the mortgaged property or to place such insurance when the mortgage servicer knows or has reason to know that the insurance is in effect.

For a mortgage servicer to place hazard, homeowner’s, or flood insurance on a mortgaged property for an amount that exceeds either the value of the insurable improvements or the last known coverage amount of insurance.

For a mortgage servicer to fail to provide to the borrower a refund of unearned premiums paid by a borrower or charged to the borrower for hazard, homeowner’s, or flood insurance placed by a mortgage lender or mortgage servicer if the borrower provides reasonable proof that the borrower has obtained coverage such that the forced placement is no longer necessary and the property is insured. If the borrower provides reasonable proof within 12 months of the placement that no lapse in coverage occurred such that the forced placement was not necessary, the mortgage servicer shall refund the entire premium.

For a mortgage servicer to refuse to reinstate a delinquent loan upon a tender of payment made timely under the contract which is sufficient in amount, based upon the last written statement received by the borrower, to pay all past due amounts, outstanding or overdue charges, and restore the loan to a nondelinquent status, but this reinstatement shall be available to a borrower no more than twice in any 24-month period.

For a person acting as a mortgage servicer to fail to mail, at least 45 days before foreclosure is initiated, a notice addressed to the borrower at the borrower’s last known address with the following information:

An itemization of all past due amounts causing the loan to be in default.

An itemization of any other charges that must be paid in order to bring the loan current.

A statement that the borrower may have options available other than foreclosure and that the borrower may discuss the options with the mortgage lender, the mortgage servicer, or a counselor approved by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD).

The address, telephone number, and other contact information for the mortgage lender, the mortgage servicer, or the agent for either of them who is authorized to attempt to work with the borrower to avoid foreclosure.

The name, address, telephone number, and other contact information for one or more HUD-approved counseling agencies operating to assist borrowers in North Carolina to avoid foreclosure.

The address, telephone number, and other contact information for the State Home Foreclosure Prevention Project of the Housing Finance Agency.

To fail to make all payments from any escrow account held for the borrower for insurance, taxes, and other charges with respect to the property in a timely manner so as to ensure that no late penalties are assessed or other negative consequences result regardless of whether the loan is delinquent, unless there are not sufficient funds in the account to cover the payments and the mortgage servicer has a reasonable basis to believe that recovery of the funds will not be possible.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2013-327, s. 11; 2014-115, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-327, s. 11, effective September 1, 2013, in subdivision (3), added “or transitional mortgage loan originator” and made a minor stylistic change. For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2014-115, s. 4, effective August 11, 2014, substituted “State Home Foreclosure Prevention Project of the Housing Finance Agency” for “consumer complaint section of the Office of the Commissioner of Banks” in sub-subdivision (22)f.

§ 53-244.112.
Criminal penalties for unlicensed activity.

Engaging in the mortgage business as defined by G.S. 53-244.030(11) or acting as a mortgage loan originator without a license as required by the provisions of

G.S. 53-244.040

is a Class 3 misdemeanor. Each transaction involving unlicensed activity is a separate offense.

History.

2009-374, s. 2.

§ 53-244.113.
Regulatory authority.

Unless otherwise provided, all actions, hearings, and procedures under this Article shall be governed by Article 3A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

For purposes of this Article, the Commissioner shall be deemed to have complied with the requirements of law concerning service of process upon mailing by certified mail any notice required or permitted to a licensee or registrant under this Article, postage prepaid and addressed to the last known address of the licensee or registrant on file with the Commissioner pursuant to G.S. 53-244.105(c).

Upon the issuance of any summary order permitted under this Article, including summary suspensions and cease and desist orders, the Commissioner shall promptly notify the person subject to the order that the order has been entered and the reasons for the order. Within 20 days of receiving notice of the order, the person subject to the order may request in writing a hearing before the Commissioner. Upon receipt of such a request, the Commissioner shall calendar a hearing within 15 days. If a licensee or registrant does not request a hearing, the order will remain in effect unless it is modified or vacated by the Commissioner.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2015-293, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-293, s. 1, effective November 1, 2015, inserted “or registrant” following “licensee” three times in subsections (b) and (c). For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 53-244.114.
Licensure and registration authority.

The Commissioner may, by order, deny, suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew a license or registration of a licensee, registrant, or applicant under this Article, or may restrict or limit the manner in which a licensee, registrant, applicant, any person who owns an interest in or participates in the business of a licensee and engages in the mortgage business, or any person who owns an interest in or participates in the business of a registrant and engages in the business of a registrant, if the Commissioner finds both of the following:

That the order is in the public interest; and

That any of the following circumstances apply to the applicant, licensee, registrant, or any partner, member, manager, officer, director, loan originator, qualifying individual, or any person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions or any person directly or indirectly controlling the applicant, licensee, or registrant. The person:

Has filed an application for licensure or registration, report, or other document to the Commissioner that, as of its effective date or as of any date after filing, contained any statement that, in light of the circumstances under which it was made, is false or misleading with respect to any material fact.

Has violated or failed to comply with any provision of this Article, rule adopted by the Commissioner, or order of the Commissioner.

Is permanently or temporarily enjoined by any court of competent jurisdiction from engaging in or continuing any conduct or practice involving any aspect of the mortgage business.

Is the subject of an order of the Commissioner denying or suspending that person’s (i) license as a mortgage loan originator, transitional mortgage loan originator, mortgage broker, mortgage lender, or mortgage servicer or (ii) registration as a registrant or its equivalent.

Is the subject of an order entered within the past five years by the authority of any state or federal agency with jurisdiction over the mortgage brokerage, mortgage lending, or mortgage servicing industry.

Fails at any time to meet the requirements of

G.S. 53-244.060

, 53-244.070, 53-244.080, 53-244.090, 53-244.100, 53-244.103, or 53-244.104.

Controls or has controlled any mortgage broker, mortgage lender, mortgage servicer, or registrant or its equivalent who has been subject to an order or injunction described in sub-subdivision c., d., or e. of this subdivision.

Has been the qualifying individual, branch manager, mortgage loan originator, or transitional mortgage loan originator of a licensee or registrant who had knowledge of or reasonably should have had knowledge of, or participated in, any activity that resulted in the entry of an order under this Article suspending or withdrawing the license of a licensee or registration of a registrant.

Has failed to respond to inquiries from the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee regarding any complaints filed against the licensee or registrant which allege or appear to involve violation of this Article or any law or rule affecting the mortgage lending business.

Has failed to respond to and cooperate fully with notices from the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee relating to the scheduling and conducting of an examination or investigation under this Article.

In the event the Commissioner has reason to believe that a licensee, registrant, individual, or person subject to this Article may have violated or failed to comply with any provision of this Article, the Commissioner may take either of the following actions:

Summarily order the licensee, registrant, individual, or person to cease and desist from any harmful activities or violations of this Article.

Summarily suspend the (i) license of the licensee under this Article or (ii) the registration of a registrant under this Article.These summary powers are in addition to the summary suspension procedures authorized by

G.S. 150B-3(c)

.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2013-327, s. 12; 2013-412, ss. 4, 4.1; 2015-293, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-327, s. 12, effective September 1, 2013, added “or transitional mortgage loan originator” or similar language in sub-subdivisions (a)(2)d., (a)(2)e., and (a)(2)h.; and made a minor stylistic change in subdivision (a)(2)h. For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2013-412, s. 4, effective August 23, 2013, substituted “originator” for “officer, limited loan officer” in subdivision (a)(2); and, in sub-subdivision (a)(2)e., added “or federal agency,” substituted “the” for “that state’s”, and deleted “denying that person’s license as a mortgage loan originator, mortgage broker, mortgage lender, or mortgage servicer.” For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2015-293, s. 1, effective November 1, 2015, inserted “and registration” in the section heading; inserted “registrant,” “or registrant,” “or registration,” and similar language throughout the section; rewrote the introductory language of subsection (a); added clause (ii) in sub-subdivision (a)(2)d.; inserted “or registrant or its equivalent” in sub-subdivision (a)(2)g.; added “take either of the following actions” at the end of the introductory language of subsection (b); added clause (ii) in subdivision (b)(2);
and made minor stylistic changes. For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 53-244.115.
Investigation and examination authority.

For purposes of initial licensing or registration, renewal, suspension, conditioning, revocation, or termination, or general or specific inquiry, investigation, or examination to determine compliance with this Article, the Commissioner may access, receive, and use any books, accounts, records, files, documents, information, or evidence, including all of the following:

Criminal, civil, and administrative history information, including nonconviction data.

Personal history and experience information, including independent credit reports obtained from a consumer reporting agency described in section 603(p) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act.

Any other documents, information, or evidence the Commissioner deems relevant to the inquiry, investigation, or examination regardless of the location, possession, control, or custody of the documents, information, or evidence.

For purposes of investigating violations or complaints arising under this Article, or for the purposes of examination, the Commissioner may review, investigate, or examine any licensee, registrant, individual, or person subject to this Article as often as necessary in order to carry out the purposes of this Article. The Commissioner may interview the officer, principals, person with control, qualified individual, mortgage loan originators, transitional mortgage loan originators, employees, independent contractors, agents, and customers of the licensee, registrant, individual, or person concerning their business. The Commissioner may direct, subpoena, or order the attendance of and examine under oath all persons whose testimony may be required about the loans or the business or subject matter of any examination or investigation and may direct, subpoena, or order the person to produce books, accounts, records, files, and any other documents the Commissioner deems relevant to the inquiry. The assessment set forth in

G.S. 53-244.100

A is for the purpose of meeting the cost of regulation under this Article. Any investigation or examination that, in the opinion of the Commissioner of Banks, requires extraordinary review, investigation, or special examination shall be subject to the actual costs of additional expenses and the hourly rate for the staff’s time, to be determined annually by the Banking Commission.

Each licensee, registrant, individual, or person subject to this Article shall make available to the Commissioner upon request the books and records relating to the operations of the licensee, registrant, individual, or person. No licensee, registrant, individual, or person subject to investigation or examination under this section may knowingly withhold, abstract, remove, mutilate, destroy, or secrete any books, records, computer records, or other information. Each licensee, registrant, individual, or person subject to this Article shall also make available for interview by the Commissioner the officers, principals, persons with control, qualified individuals, mortgage loan originators, transitional mortgage loan originators, employees, independent contractors, agents, and customers of the licensee, registrant, individual, or person concerning their business.

Each licensee, registrant, individual, or person subject to this Article shall make or compile such reports or prepare other information as may be directed or requested by the Commissioner in order to carry out the purposes of this section, including any of the following:

Accounting compilations.

Information lists and data concerning loan transactions in a format prescribed by the Commissioner.

Periodic reports, including any of the following:

Annual Report Questionnaire.

Servicer Activity Report.

Servicer Schedule of the Ranges of Costs and Fees.

Lender/Servicer Audited Statements of Financial Condition.

Broker Certified Statements of Financial Condition.

Quarterly Loan Origination Reports.

Any other information deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In making any examination or investigation authorized by this Article, the Commissioner may control access to any documents and records of the licensee, registrant, or person under examination or investigation. The Commissioner may take possession of the documents and records or place a person in exclusive charge of the documents and records in the place where they are usually kept. During the period of control, no individual or person shall remove or attempt to remove any of the documents and records except pursuant to a court order or with the consent of the Commissioner. Unless the Commissioner has reasonable grounds to believe the documents or records of the licensee or registrant have been or are at risk of being altered or destroyed for purposes of concealing a violation of this Article, the licensee, registrant, or owner of the documents and records shall have access to the documents or records as necessary to conduct its ordinary business.

In order to carry out the purposes of this section, the Commissioner may do any of the following:

Retain attorneys, accountants, or other professionals and specialists as examiners, auditors, or investigators to conduct or assist in the conduct of examinations or investigations.

Enter into agreements or relationships with other government officials or regulatory associations in order to improve efficiencies and reduce regulatory burden by sharing resources, standardized or uniform methods or procedures, documents, records, information, or evidence obtained under this section.

Use, hire, contract, or employ public or privately available analytical systems, methods, or software to examine or investigate the licensee, individual, or person subject to this Article.

Accept and rely on examination or investigation reports made by other government officials, within or without this State.

Accept audit reports made by an independent certified public accountant for the licensee, registrant, individual, or person in the course of that part of the examination covering the same general subject matter as the audit and may incorporate the audit report in the report of the examination, report of investigation, or other writing of the Commissioner.

In addition to the authority granted by

G.S. 53-244.113

and

G.S. 53-244.115

, the Commissioner is authorized to take action, including summary suspension of the license or registration, if the licensee or registrant fails, within 20 days or a lesser time if specifically requested for good cause, to do any of the following:

Respond to inquiries from the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee regarding any complaints filed against the licensee or registrant that allege or appear to involve violation of this Article or any law or rule affecting the mortgage lending business.

Respond to and cooperate fully with notices from the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee relating to the scheduling and conducting of an examination or investigation under this Article.

Consent to a criminal history record check. The refusal shall constitute grounds for the Commissioner to deny licensure to the applicant as well as to any entity that meets any of the following criteria:

By whom or by which the applicant is employed.

Over which the applicant has control.

As to which the applicant is the current or proposed qualifying individual or a current or proposed branch manager.

The authority of this section shall remain in effect, whether a licensee, registrant, individual, or person subject to this Article acts or claims to act under any licensing or registration law of the State, or claims to act without such authority.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2012-37, s. 3; 2013-327, s. 13; 2015-293, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-37, s. 3, effective October 1, 2012, deleted “at the expense of the applicant or licensee” following “the Commissioner may” in the introductory paragraph in subsection (a); and in subsection (b), deleted the former last sentence, which read: “The reasonable cost of the investigation or examination shall be charged against the licensee, individual, or person subject to this Article” and added the last sentence.

Session Laws 2013-327, s. 13, effective September 1, 2013, added “transitional mortgage loan originators” in the second sentence of subsection (b) and the last sentence of subsection (c). For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2015-293, s. 1, effective November 1, 2015, inserted “or registration,” “registrant,” and “or registrant” throughout the section; added “all of the following” at the end of the introductory language of subsection (a); added “any of the following” at the end of the introductory language of subsection (d) and subdivision (d)(3); added “do any of the following” at the end of the introductory language of subsections (f) and (g); added “that meets any of the following criteria” at the end of the introductory language of subdivision (g)(3); and made minor stylistic changes. For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 53-244.116.
Disciplinary authority.

The Commissioner may, by order:

Take any action authorized under

G.S. 53-244.113

.

Impose a civil penalty upon a licensee, registrant, individual, or person subject to this Article, or upon any partner, officer, director, or other person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions on behalf of a licensee, registrant, or other person subject to this Article for any violation of or failure to comply with this Article. The civil penalty shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation of or failure to comply with this Article. Each violation of or failure to comply with this Article shall be a separate and distinct violation.

Impose a civil penalty upon a licensee, registrant, individual, or person subject to this Article, or upon any partner, officer, director, or other person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions on behalf of a licensee, registrant, or other person subject to this Article for any violation of or failure to comply with any directive or order of the Commissioner. The civil penalty shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation of or failure to comply with any directive or order of the Commissioner. Each violation of or failure to comply with any directive or order of the Commissioner shall be a separate and distinct violation.

Require a licensee, registrant, individual, or person subject to this Article to disgorge and pay to a borrower or other individual any amounts received by the licensee, registrant, individual, or person subject to the Article, including any employee of the person, to the extent that the amounts were collected in violation of Chapter 24 of the General Statutes or in excess of those allowed by law.

Prohibit licensees or registrants under this Article from engaging in acts and practices in connection with residential mortgage loans that the Commissioner finds to be unfair, deceptive, designed to evade the laws of this State, or that are not in the best interest of the borrowing public.

When a licensee or registrant is accused of any act, omission, or misconduct that would subject the licensee or registrant to disciplinary action, the licensee or registrant, with the consent and approval of the Commissioner, may surrender the license or registration and all the rights and privileges pertaining to it. A person who surrenders a license shall not be eligible for or submit any application for licensure under this Article during any period specified by the Commissioner, and a person who surrenders a registration shall not be eligible for or submit any application for registration under this Article during any period specified by the Commissioner.

The requirements of this Article apply to any person who seeks to avoid its application by any device, subterfuge, or pretense whatsoever, including structuring a loan in a manner to avoid classification of the loan as a residential mortgage loan.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2013-412, s. 5; 2015-293, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-412, s. 5, effective August 23, 2013, added “during any period specified by the Commissioner” at the end of subsection (b).

Session Laws 2015-293, s. 1, effective November 1, 2015, inserted “registrant,” “or registrants,” and similar language throughout subsections (a) and (b); and in subsection (b), inserted “or registration” in the first sentence and added the language beginning “and a person who surrenders a registration” in the second sentence. For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 53-244.117.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-412, s. 6, effective August 23, 2013.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; repealed by 2013-412, s. 6, effective August 23, 2013.

§ 53-244.118.
Rule-making authority; records.

The Commissioner may adopt any rules that the Commissioner deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this Article, to provide for the protection of the borrowing public, to prohibit unfair or deceptive practices, to instruct mortgage lenders, mortgage brokers, mortgage servicers, mortgage loan originators, transitional mortgage loan originators, or registrants in interpreting this Article, and to implement and interpret the provisions of

G.S. 24-1.1

E, 24-1.1F, and 24-10.2 as they apply to licensees and registrants under this Article.

The Commissioner shall keep a list of all applicants for licensure or registration under this Article or claimants of exempt status under G.S. 53-244.050(g) that includes the date of application, name, place of residence, and whether the license, registration, or claim of exempt status was granted or denied.

The Commissioner shall keep a current roster showing the names and places of business of all licensees and registrants that shows their respective mortgage loan originators and transitional mortgage loan originators and a roster of exempt persons required to file a notice under G.S. 53-244.050(g). The roster shall meet all of the following requirements:

Be kept on file in the office of the Commissioner.

Contain information regarding all orders or other actions taken against the licensees, registrants, and other persons.

Be open to public inspection.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2013-327, s. 14; 2015-293, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-327, s. 14, effective September 1, 2013, in subsection (a), inserted “or transitional mortgage loan originators” and made a stylistic change, and in subsection (c), inserted “and transitional mortgage loan originators”. For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2015-293, s. 1, effective November 1, 2015, inserted “or registrants” and similar language referring to registrants and registration throughout the section; added “meet all of the following requirements” at the end of the introductory language of subsection (c); and made minor stylistic changes. For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 53-244.119.
Commissioner’s participation in nationwide registry.

The Commissioner shall require mortgage loan originators and transitional mortgage loan originators to be licensed and registered through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. In order to carry out this requirement, the Commissioner is authorized to participate in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. For this purpose, the Commissioner may establish by rule any requirements as necessary, including:

Background checks for:

Criminal history through fingerprint or other databases;

Civil or administrative records;

Credit history; or

Any other information as deemed necessary by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

The payment of fees to apply for, renew, or amend licenses through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry;

The setting or resetting as necessary of renewal or reporting dates; and

Requirements for amending or surrendering a license or any other activities as the Commissioner deems necessary for participation in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

The Commissioner is authorized to establish relationships or contracts with the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry or other entities designated by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry to collect and maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees, registrants, or other persons subject to this Article.

For the purpose of participating in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, the Commissioner is authorized to waive or modify, in whole or in part, any or all of the requirements of this Article and to establish new requirements as reasonably necessary to participate in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

The Commissioner is authorized to enter into agreements to license the use of the proprietary software owned by the Office of the Commissioner of Banks to banking, mortgage, or financial services supervisory agencies of other states.

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-37, s. 4, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2010-168, s. 6; 2012-37, s. 4; 2013-327, s. 15; 2015-293, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-168, s. 6, effective September 1, 2010, added subsection (e).

Session Laws 2012-37, s. 4, effective October 1, 2012, repealed subsection (e), which allowed the Commissioner to require a licensee to pay a reasonable administrative processing fee for licensing status changes.

Session Laws 2013-327, s. 15, effective September 1, 2013, inserted “and transitional mortgage loan originators” in the first sentence of subsection (a). For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2015-293, s. 1, effective November 1, 2015, inserted “registrants” following “related to licensees” near the end of subsection (b). For applicability, see editor’s note.